California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(2) If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a trust that is not covered by paragraph (1), in the office of the Secretary of State.

(3) If the person against whose interest the lien applies is the estate of a decedent, in the office of the Secretary of State. 

(4) In all other cases, in the office of the recorder of the county where the person against whose interest the lien applies resides at the time of filing of the notice of lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 892, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

Certification of notices of liens, certificates, or other notices affecting federal liens by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States or his or her delegate, or by any official or entity of the United States responsible for filing or certifying of notice of any other lien, entitles them to be filed and no other attestation, certification, or acknowledgment is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

(a) If a notice of federal lien, a refiling of a notice of federal lien, or a notice of revocation of any certificate described in subdivision (b) is presented to a filing officer who is:

(1) The Secretary of State, he or she shall cause the notice to be filed, indexed, and marked in accordance with the provisions of Sections 9515, 9516, and
 9522 of the Commercial Code as if the notice were a financing statement within the meaning of that code; or

(2) A county recorder, he or she shall accept for filing, file for record in the manner set forth in Section 27320 of the Government Code, and index the document by the name of the person against whose interest the lien applies in the general index.

(b) If a certificate of release, nonattachment, discharge, or subordination of any lien is presented to the Secretary of State for filing he or she shall:

(1) Cause a certificate of release or nonattachment to be filed, indexed, and marked as if the certificate were a termination statement within the meaning of the Commercial Code.

(2) Cause a certificate of discharge or subordination to be filed,
 indexed, and marked as if the certificate were a release of collateral within the meaning of the Commercial Code.

(c) If a refiled notice of federal lien referred to in subdivision (a) or any of the certificates or notices referred to in subdivision (b) is presented for filing to a county recorder, he or she shall accept for filing, file for record in the manner set forth in Section 27320 of the Government Code, and index the document by the name of the person against whose interest the lien applies in the general index.

(d) Upon request of any person, the filing officer shall issue his or her certificate showing whether there is on file, on the date and hour stated therein, any notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting any lien filed after January 1, 1968, under this title or former Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code,
 naming a particular person, and if a notice or certificate is on file, giving the date and hour of filing of each notice or certificate. Upon request, the filing officer shall furnish a copy of any notice of federal lien, or notice or certificate affecting a federal lien. If the filing officer is a county recorder, the fee for a certificate for each name searched shall be set by the filing officer in an amount that covers actual costs, and the fee for copies shall be in accordance with Section 27366 of the Government Code. If the filing officer is the Secretary of State, the certificate shall be issued as part of a combined certificate pursuant to Section 9528 of the Commercial Code, and the fee for the certificate and copies shall be in accordance with that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 2.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

The fee charged for recording and indexing each notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting the lien filed with the county recorder shall be the same as those established by Article 5 (commencing with Section 27360) of Chapter 6 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code for the recording and indexing of documents.

The fee for filing and indexing each notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting the lien with the office of the Secretary of State is set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 12194
 of the Government Code.

The officer shall bill the district directors of internal revenue or other appropriate federal officials on a monthly basis for fees for documents recorded or filed by the county recorder or the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1000, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

Filing officers with whom notices of federal tax liens, certificates and notices affecting such liens have been filed on or before January 1, 1968, shall, after that date, continue to maintain a file labeled “federal tax lien notices filed prior to January 2, 1968” containing notices and certificates filed in numerical order of receipt. If a notice of lien was filed on or before January 1, 1968, any certificate or notice affecting the lien shall be filed in the same office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

This title shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this title among states enacting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.5.

This title shall be applied and construed to permit the transmission, filing, recording, and indexing of notices of federal tax liens and all certificates that relate to or affect those liens, including, but not limited to, certificates of release, discharge, subordination, and nonattachment, by electronic or magnetic means, using computerized data processing, telecommunications, and other similar information technologies available to the filing offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

This title may be cited as the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

